Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 35

Private Protective Services Licensing and Regulatory Act

62-35-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Private Protective Services Licensing and Regulatory Act.”

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 1.

Cross-References. Weapons, title 39, ch. 17, part 13.

Attorney General Opinions. Ability of an armed security guard to carry a weapon on breaks and during off duty hours, OAG 99-189, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 209 (9/22/99).

The Private Protective Services Licensing and Regulatory Act does not prohibit employment of private security guards to protect public property, OAG 03-132, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 155 (10/08/03).

It is possible that a court could conclude that federal law giving United States Department of Energy (DOE) exclusive jurisdiction over nuclear safety at DOE-owned facilities preempts state law, and that private security guards employed by a private security company under contract with DOE could direct traffic on public roads to the extent necessary to maintain nuclear safety, OAG 05-011, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 11 (1/26/05).

Authority of private security guards employed by a company under contract with United States Department of Energy to direct traffic on public roads to the extent necessary to maintain nuclear safety, OAG 05-011, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 11 (1/26/05).

Part-time officers as licensed security guards. OAG 12-77, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 73 (7/25/12).

Searches and arrests on school property. OAG 14-21, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 22 (2/24/14).

62-35-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Armed security guard/officer” means a security guard/officer who at any time wears, carries, possesses or has access to a firearm or any facsimile of any firearm that may leave the impression that the person is armed and who works in plainclothes or wears dress of a distinctive design or fashion or dress having any symbol, badge, emblem, insignia or device that identifies or tends to identify the wearer as a security guard/officer;

“Branch manager” means the individual who is immediately responsible for the operation of a branch office;

“Branch office” means any office of a contract security company within this state other than its principal place of business within this state;

“Certified trainer” means any individual certified by the commissioner as qualified to administer and certify to successful completion of the minimum training requirements prescribed by this chapter for a security guard/officer;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce and insurance or the commissioner's designee;

“Contract security company” means any person engaging in the business of providing or undertaking to provide a security guard and patrol service on a contractual basis for another person;

“Licensee” means any contract security company licensed in accordance with this chapter;

“Person” means any individual, firm, association, company, partnership, corporation, nonprofit organization, institution or similar entity;

“Principal corporate officer” means the chief executive officer, president, vice president, treasurer, secretary or comptroller, as well as any other responsible officer or executive employee who performs functions for the corporation corresponding to those performed by the chief executive officer, president, vice president, treasurer, secretary or comptroller;

“Proprietary security organization” means any person or department of the organization that employs a security guard/officer solely for the person in an employer/employee relationship;

“Qualifying agent” means a principal corporate officer meeting the qualifications set forth in this chapter for operating a contract security company;

“Qualifying manager” means an individual designated by a proprietary security organization to be responsible for compliance with this chapter on behalf of the organization;

“Registrant” means an individual who holds a valid registration card;

“Registration card” means a pocket card issued by the commissioner evidencing that the holder has met the qualifications required by this chapter to perform the duties of a security guard/officer in this state;

“Security guard/officer” means an individual employed by a contract security company or a proprietary security organization whose primary duty is to perform any function of a security guard and patrol service;

“Security guard and patrol service” means protection of persons or property, or both, from criminal activities, including, but not limited to:

Prevention or detection, or both, of intrusion, unauthorized entry, larceny, vandalism, abuse, fire or trespass on private property;

Prevention, observation or detection of any unauthorized activity on private property;

Enforcement of rules, regulations or local or state laws on private property;

Control, regulation or direction of the flow or movements of the public, whether by vehicle or otherwise on private property; or

Street patrol service;

“Street patrol service” means the utilization of foot patrols, motor patrols or any other means of transportation in public areas or on public thoroughfares in order to serve multiple customers or facilities. “Street patrol service” does not apply to:

A management supervisor moving from one (1) customer or facility to another to inspect personnel; or

A security guard/officer traveling from one (1) facility to another to serve the same customer with multiple facilities;

“Sworn peace officer” means any individual who derives plenary or special law enforcement powers, such as the power of arrest, from, and is an employee of, a federal, state, or local governmental agency or instrumentality;

“Unarmed security guard/officer” means a security guard/officer who never wears, carries or has access to a firearm or any facsimile of a firearm that may leave the impression that the person is armed with a firearm, but who may carry other nonlethal devices as prescribed in this chapter with the proper certification and who works in plainclothes or wears dress of a distinctive design or fashion or dress having any symbol, badge, emblem, insignia, or device that identifies or tends to identify the wearer as a security guard/officer; and

“Undercover agent” means an individual hired by another person, through a contract security company to perform a job in or for that person, and while performing the job, to act as an undercover employee, independent contractor or operative of the person, but under the supervision of the contract security company.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 2; 1988, ch. 987, § 1; 1996, ch. 1009, §§ 5-7, 28; 1997, ch. 391, § 1; 2020, ch. 580, § 10.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “security guard/officer” for “security officer/guard” throughout the definitions of “armed security officer/guard” and “unarmed security officer/guard”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 580, § 19. July 1, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. Retail employees not within definition of “security guard/officer,” OAG 97-120, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 153 (9/02/97).

A city police department may restrict or prohibit a law enforcement officer from working secondary employment for a “contract security company” during off-duty time, OAG 01-075, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 66 (5/8/01).

A city police department may refuse to enter into a contract for a fee with a “contract security company” to provide “on duty” law enforcement officers for the primary use and benefit of the “contract security company;” however, the police department and its officers might incur liability if the police department discriminated between a “contract security company” and a “proprietary security company” by allowing officers to work for a “proprietary security company” but not a “contract security company,” OAG 01-075, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 66 (5/8/01).

A company or other “person” that provides funeral escort services is not required to be licensed as a contract security company, and registration of either such company's personnel or any other “person,” as either armed or unarmed security guard, is also not required, OAG 02-123, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 128 (11/15/02).

Security officers have the same power of arrest as that afforded to private citizens, OAG 03-018, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 23 (2/19/03).

Negligent actions or omissions by private security guards and other private citizens would not trigger liability under the Governmental Tort Liability Act, OAG 03-088, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 107 (7/15/03).

Tennessee Code Annotated Title 62, Chapter 35 security officers do not have the authority to enforce motor vehicle restrictions under T.C.A. title 55, chapter 8, OAG 03-088, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 107 (7/15/03).

If a security officer has a reasonable belief that unauthorized activity is taking place on the property, the officer may stop the person, OAG 03-149, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 166 (11/17/03).

A security guard is authorized to stop a vehicle for trespassing, or any other violation of law, OAG 03-149, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 166 (11/17/03).

A security officer has the right to stop a person for questioning on property he/she is hired to protect, but only within the scope of the suspect's consent unless the officer has placed the suspect under arrest, OAG 04-006, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 4 (1/12/04).

A security officer has the right to stop a person in a vehicle for trespassing or any other law violation that occurs in his/her view on property the officer was hired to protect, but the officer may not detain the suspect without consent; he or she must either arrest the suspect on supportable probable cause or expel the suspect from the property, OAG 04-006, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 4 (1/12/04).

A security officer lacks the authority to detain a suspect without consent unless the officer has arrested the suspect on supportable probable cause, OAG 04-006, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 4 (1/12/04).

A private college that employs unarmed security guards comes within the definition of a proprietary security organization, OAG 06-146, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 166 (9/26/06).

License for Church Congregations Using Volunteer Members for Security Purposes, OAG 15-64, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 64 (8/21/15).

The registration requirements of the Private Protective Services Licensing and Regulatory Act do not apply to companies that use or provide certified law enforcement officers to others exclusively for traffic control purposes within temporary work zones. Since the Act “does not apply to” companies that employ law enforcement officers exclusively to direct traffic in temporary work zones, the Commissioner of Commerce and Insurance has no authority to regulate or inspect or investigate them. A law enforcement agency is not a “person” as defined by the Act. OAG 17-28, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 27 (4/11/2017).

62-35-103. Exemptions from chapter provisions.

This chapter does not apply to:

A government officer or employee performing official duties;

A consumer reporting agency, as defined by the Federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. § 1681 et seq.);

An attorney at law or the attorney's agent performing duties relating to the attorney's practice of law;

An insurance company, agent, broker or adjuster performing investigative duties in connection with insurance business transacted;

A holder of a purchase money security interest or the holder's agent repossessing the personal property in which the interest is held;

A private business employee conducting investigations relating to the internal affairs of the business;

A full-time sworn peace officer receiving compensation for services as a guard, patrol or watchperson under a contract with a private business that is properly licensed by the state;

An unarmed employee, whether uniformed or nonuniformed, in the course and scope of employment of a hospital who exceeds all training requirements established in § 62-35-118 by having received no less than twelve (12) classroom hours of training. The course curriculum for the training shall be on file with the commissioner;

Private entities contracting with governmental entities for the care, supervision or transportation of inmates. This exemption shall in no way authorize government contracts for the care, supervision or transportation of inmates;

A private special deputy appointed pursuant to § 38-8-118;

A special deputy appointed pursuant to § 8-8-212 or a special police officer appointed by the chief of police in a county having a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A retired peace officer receiving compensation for services as a guard, patrol or watchperson under a contract with a private business that is properly licensed by the state; provided, that the retired peace officer:

Completes the firearms and marksmanship training required by § 62-35-118(b); and

Has a written directive issued by the executive supervisor of the organization to which the person was attached or employed authorizing the person to carry a handgun;

One (1) designated employee per business location of a private company, firm, partnership or corporation that is not a contract security company or proprietary security organization whose duties include those of an unarmed security guard/officer during nonbusiness hours;

Pursuant to this subdivision (a)(13), no person, while performing any function of a security guard and patrol service during nonbusiness hours, shall:

Wear or display any badge, insignia, shield, patch or pattern that:

Indicates or tends to indicate that the person is a sworn peace officer;

Contains or includes the word “police” or the equivalent of that word; or

Is similar in wording to any law enforcement agency in this state; or

Have or utilize any vehicle or equipment that:

Displays the words “police,” “law enforcement officer,” or the equivalent of those words; or

Has any sign, shield, accessory or insignia that may indicate that the vehicle or equipment belongs to a public law enforcement agency;

A special police officer appointed by a chief of police or by the sheriff in any county having a population of no less than one hundred fifty-three thousand (153,000) nor more than one hundred fifty-three thousand one hundred (153,100), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent census. A special police officer appointed pursuant to this subdivision (a)(14) shall have qualifications that are equivalent or superior to those required for a law enforcement officer under the standards established by the peace officer standards and training commission for law enforcement officers; or

A company using or providing certified law enforcement officers to others exclusively for traffic control purposes within temporary work zones located in the public right-of-way and established in accordance with the manual on uniform traffic control devices (MUTCD); provided, however, that any department providing the law enforcement officers may require the company to have on staff a traffic control supervisor or a traffic engineer in order to insure compliance with the MUTCD and may also require the company to demonstrate proof of liability insurance; or

Commissioned, uniformed police officers, state troopers and/or sheriff deputies, upon departmental approval, are authorized, regardless of primary jurisdiction, to direct traffic in departmental approved uniforms or utilizing other governmental equipment, as may be required, in temporary work zones or for incident management purposes, to meet the needs of and control all road users, whether motorists, bicyclists, or pedestrians, within the highway, including persons with disabilities in accordance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA), Title II, Paragraph 35.130, upon any public roadway located within the state.

Section 62-35-118(a), only, shall not apply to a person employed as an unarmed security guard/officer by a proprietary security organization.

For the purposes of this subsection (b), an unarmed security guard/officer shall not carry a weapon of any kind.

It is the desire of the general assembly that unarmed proprietary security guards/officers whose primary duties involve contact with the public should have training in the areas of legal powers and limitations and of emergency procedures as deemed necessary by their employers. The commissioner may provide the employers information concerning these areas.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 3; 1988, ch. 987, § 2; 1989, ch. 142, § 1; 1990, ch. 816, §§ 1, 2; 1996, ch. 1009, §§ 8, 9; 1997, ch. 118, § 1; 1997, ch. 137, § 1; 1997, ch. 274, § 1; 1998, ch. 865, § 1; 2001, ch. 452, § 2; 2002, ch. 590, § 1; 2004, ch. 661, § 2; 2006, ch. 862, § 4; 2006, ch. 1013, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 137, § 2 provided that (a)(10), added by that act, is retroactive to October 31, 1996.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

The Americans with Disabilities Act, referred to in this section, is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq.

Attorney General Opinions. A security officer is authorized to detect trespassers, OAG 03-148, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 165 (11/17/03).

Security guards are authorized to enforce state and local laws on private property, OAG 03-148, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 165 (11/17/03).

A security guard may enter a room to prevent and detect the use of illegal drugs, OAG 03-148, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 165 (11/17/03).

A security officer may be considered an agent of the person in control of the property, OAG 03-148, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 165 (11/17/03).

Part-time officers as licensed security guards. OAG 12-77, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 73 (7/25/12).

Authority of full-time law enforcement officers and reserve officers, both on or off duty, and funeral escort services as to use of flashing blue lights and sirens. OAG 13-52, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 52 (7/2/13).

The departmental approval required under T.C.A. § 62-35-103(a)(15)(B) refers to approval from the law enforcement agency of the individual peace officer’s primary jurisdiction, not to approval from the Commissioner. The exemption in T.C.A. § 62-35-103(a)(15)(B) applies to part-time or reserve peace officers who are commissioned by a Tennessee law enforcement agency but not certified by Tennessee Peace Officer Standards and Training Commission (“POST”). OAG 16-43, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 43 (12/14/2016).

Under T.C.A. § 62-35-141(a), the licensed contract security company that employs the peace officer outside the peace officer’s primary jurisdiction is responsible for notifying the chief law enforcement officer of the jurisdiction in which the peace officer is temporarily employed. The Commissioner may pursue disciplinary action against the licensed contract security company if it violates the notification requirement. T.C.A. § 62-35-141(a) applies only to full-time peace officers. The notification requirement under TC.A. § 62-35-141(a) does not apply to part-time or reserve officers regardless of their certification status with POST or the types of services they provide. OAG 16-43, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 43 (12/14/2016).

The registration requirements of the Private Protective Services Licensing and Regulatory Act do not apply to companies that use or provide certified law enforcement officers to others exclusively for traffic control purposes within temporary work zones. Since the Act “does not apply to” companies that employ law enforcement officers exclusively to direct traffic in temporary work zones, the Commissioner of Commerce and Insurance has no authority to regulate or inspect or investigate them. A law enforcement agency is not a “person” as defined by the Act. OAG 17-28, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 27 (4/11/2017).

62-35-104. License required to act as contract security company.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to act as a contract security company without having first obtained a license from the commissioner.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 4.

Cross-References. Hiring armed guards without permit from governor, § 50-1-102.

Attorney General Opinions. A company or other “person” that provides funeral escort services is not required to be licensed as a contract security company, and registration of either such company's personnel or any other “person,” as either armed or unarmed security guard, is also not required, OAG 02-123, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 128 (11/15/02).

License for Church Congregations Using Volunteer Members for Security Purposes, OAG 15-64, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 64 (8/21/15).

62-35-105. Application for licenses — Filing — Form — Contents.

An application for a contract security company license shall be filed with the commissioner on the prescribed form. The application shall include:

The full name and business address of the applicant;

If the applicant is a partnership, the name and address of each partner; or

If the applicant is a corporation, the name and address of the qualifying agent;

The name under which the applicant intends to do business;

The address of the principal place of business and all branch offices of the applicant within this state;

As to each individual applicant or, if the applicant is a partnership, as to each partner or, if the applicant is a corporation, as to the qualifying agent, the following information:

Full name;

Date and place of birth;

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

One (1) set of classifiable electronic fingerprints; and

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

A list of all convictions and pending charges of commission of a felony or misdemeanor in any jurisdiction;

If the applicant is a corporation, the following information:

The correct legal name of the corporation;

The state and date of incorporation;

The date the corporation qualified to do business in this state;

The address of the corporate headquarters, if located outside this state; and

The names of two (2) principal corporate officers other than the qualifying agent and the business address, residence address and the office held by each in the corporation; and

Other information the commissioner may reasonably require.

The application shall be subscribed and sworn to:

By the applicant, if the applicant is an individual;

By each partner, if the applicant is a partnership; or

By the qualifying agent, if the applicant is a corporation.

Any individual signing the application must be at least twenty-one (21) years of age.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, a properly licensed contract security company may use temporary employees not registered with the department as temporary security guard/officers for special events upon the approval of a special event permit by the commissioner. A temporary security guard/officer used pursuant to this subdivision (d)(1) must:

Be at least eighteen (18) years of age;

Act as a temporary security guard/officer under a special event permit for no more than ten (10) days in a calendar year;

Have no arrest authority; and

Not be armed during the temporary employment.

Applications for a special event permit must include:

The names of the temporary employees;

The addresses of the temporary employees;

The birth dates of the temporary employees;

The fee as set by subsection (e);

The identity, location, and date of the special event or events for which the temporary employees are to be employed; and

Other information as the commissioner may reasonably require.

Applications for a special event permit must be submitted to the commissioner at least five (5) days prior to the commencement of the special event and accompanied by a fee for each temporary employee or special event permit as set by rule. If the commissioner has not set a fee for registration of a temporary employee or special event permit by rule, then the fee shall be thirty-five dollars ($35.00) per temporary employee.

A special event permit shall only be valid for the dates, locations, and events disclosed on the permit application. A new application for a special event permit must be filed for any additional dates or locations not authorized.

The commissioner may decline to issue a special event permit if the commissioner, in the commissioner's sole discretion, determines that the issuance of such a permit is not in the best interest of the public based on the size of the event, the level of security required by the event, the number of permits previously issued to a contract security company during the past year, or other factors as the commissioner may reasonably consider.

Prior to approving the request for a special event permit, the commissioner may require that any person requesting a permit provide a bond on a form acceptable to the commissioner in an amount set by the commissioner. The bond shall be for the benefit of any person who is damaged by a temporary security guard/officer acting under a special event permit.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 5; 2017, ch. 226, § 7; 2020, ch. 580, §§ 1, 2, 11.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “temporary security guard/officers” for “temporary security guards” and “temporary security guard/officer” for “temporary security guard” throughout the section; deleted (a)(4)(C) which read: “All residences during the immediate past five (5) years;”; deleted (a)(4)(D) which read: “All employment or occupations engaged in during the immediate past five (5) years;”; substituted “One (1) set of classifiable electronic fingerprints” for “Three (3) sets of classifiable fingerprints” in (a)(4)(E); and deleted (a)(4)(F) which read: “Three (3) credit references from lending institutions or business firms with whom the subject has established a credit record; and”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 580, § 19. July 1, 2020.

62-35-106. Qualifications of applicants.

Each individual applicant or, if the applicant is a partnership, each partner or, if the applicant is a corporation, the qualifying agent, must:

Be at least twenty-one (21) years of age;

Be a citizen of the United States or a resident alien;

Not have been declared by any court of competent jurisdiction incompetent by reason of mental defect or disease unless a court of competent jurisdiction has since declared the applicant competent;

Not be suffering from habitual drunkenness or narcotics addiction or dependence;

Be of good moral character; and

Possess at least three (3) years of experience as a manager, supervisor or administrator with a contract security company or proprietary security organization;

Possess at least three (3) years of experience satisfactory to the commissioner with any federal, United States military, state, county or municipal law enforcement agency; or

Pass an examination to be administered at least twice annually by the commissioner, designed to measure knowledge and competence in the contract security company business.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 6.

Attorney General Opinions. The Eligibility Verification for Entitlements Act (EVEA) can be read in harmony with laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or U.S. citizens or resident aliens and therefore did not impliedly repeal those laws. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens also violate the Equal Protection Clause because they discriminate based on alienage and would not satisfy strict scrutiny. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. Laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens do not violate the Equal Protection Clause, however, because they discriminate only against unlawful aliens and lawful aliens who are not permanent residents. Those categories of aliens are not a suspect class, and the laws at issue would likely satisfy rational basis review. The Department of Commerce and Insurance is not required to enforce the requirements that an applicant for licensure, registration, or certification be a “citizen of the United States” or a “citizen of the United States or resident alien.” OAG 18-42, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (9/13/2018).

62-35-107. Action upon applications — Investigations — Approval or denial of licenses.

Upon receipt of an application for a license, the commissioner shall:

Conduct an investigation to determine whether the statements made in the application are true;

Compare or request that the Tennessee bureau of investigation compare the fingerprints submitted with the application to fingerprints filed with the bureau; and

Submit the fingerprints to the federal bureau of investigation for a search of its files to determine whether the individual fingerprinted has any recorded convictions.

The commissioner shall issue a license in a form which the commissioner shall prescribe to qualified applicants upon receipt of a nonrefundable, nonproratable fee in accordance with the schedule promulgated by the commissioner.

If an application for a license is denied, the commissioner shall notify the applicant in writing and shall set forth the grounds for denial. If the grounds are subject to correction by the applicant, the notice of denial shall so state and specify a reasonable period of time within which the applicant must make the required correction.

An application shall be accompanied by a notarized statement sworn to by the applicant as to the number of employees in service. Making a false statement shall be punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) and assessment of the maximum application fee.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 7; 1988, ch. 717, §§ 1, 3; 1989, ch. 523, § 187; 1990, ch. 1026, § 25.

62-35-108. Posting of license.

Every license issued under this chapter shall be posted conspicuously in the licensee's principal place of business in this state.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 8.

62-35-109. License not transferable or assignable.

No contract security company license shall be transferable or assignable.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 9.

62-35-110. Renewal of license.

A contract security company license or renewal of the license shall be valid for a period of two (2) years from the date of issuance. The commissioner shall provide each licensee with a renewal application form sixty (60) days prior to the expiration of the license.

The fee for timely renewal of a license shall be in accordance with the schedule promulgated by the commissioner. A penalty fee as prescribed by the commissioner will be assessed on any renewal application postmarked after the expiration date of the license.

Licenses may be renewed up to three (3) months after their expiration by the payment of the renewal fee plus a penalty established by the commissioner for each month or portion of a month that elapses before payment is tendered.

A renewal application shall be accompanied by a notarized statement sworn to by the applicant as to the number of employees in service. Making a false statement shall be punishable by a civil penalty of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and assessment of the maximum renewal fee.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 10; 1988, ch. 717, §§ 2, 4; 1989, ch. 523, § 188; 1996, ch. 1009, § 26.

62-35-111. Qualifying agent ceasing to perform duties.

If the qualifying agent of a licensee ceases to perform the qualifying agent's duties on a regular basis, the licensee shall:

Within thirty (30) days, notify the commissioner by certified or registered mail; and

Within three (3) months, obtain a substitute qualifying agent.

The commissioner may, in the commissioner's discretion, extend the period for obtaining a substitute qualifying agent for a reasonable time.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 11.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

62-35-112. Licensee to notify commissioner of certain changes in status.

A licensee shall notify the commissioner in writing within thirty (30) days of:

Any change in the qualifying agent or principal corporate officers identified in its application for license;

Any material change in the information previously furnished or required to be furnished to the commissioner; or

Any occurrence that could reasonably be expected to affect the licensee's right to a license under this chapter.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 12.

62-35-113. Change in ownership — Application for license — Operation under old license.

If the ownership of a contract security company changes, the new owner, if not already a licensee, may not operate that company more than thirty (30) days after the date of the change of ownership unless, within the thirty-day period, the new owner submits an application for a license. If the application is submitted, the new owner may continue to operate the company until the application has been finally determined by the commissioner.

For good cause, the commissioner may extend the period for submitting an application pursuant to subsection (a) for a reasonable time.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 13.

62-35-114. Certificates of insurance — General liability coverage.

All licensees and employers of private security guards/officers shall retain a certificate of insurance evidencing general liability coverage for the negligent act or acts of the principal insured or the principal insured's agents operating in the course and scope of employment for bodily injury, personal injury and property damage, with endorsements for personal injury, including false arrest, libel, slander and invasion of privacy, in the minimum amount of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) for bodily or personal injury and one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for property damage. The certificate shall be available for inspection during normal business hours on request of the commissioner or duly appointed and identified representative or representatives. The certificates shall provide that the insurance shall not be modified or cancelled without thirty (30) days' prior notice to the commissioner. All persons required to be insured by this chapter must be insured by a carrier approved in the state in which the insurance has been purchased or in this state.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 14; 1988, ch. 987, § 3.

62-35-115. Registration cards — Guards, officers and agents.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, it is unlawful for any individual to act as an armed or unarmed security guard/officer without having first obtained the appropriate registration card from the commissioner.

Any individual who holds a valid armed security guard/officer registration card may act as an armed or unarmed security guard/officer under that registration card.

Any individual who is employed exclusively as an undercover agent is not required to hold a registration card.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 15.

Cross-References. Carrying of firearms by guards, § 62-35-125.

Hiring armed guards without permit from governor, § 50-1-102.

Attorney General Opinions. Any person, including a sworn peace officer regardless of jurisdiction, who meets the statutory qualifications and requirements, may act as a security guard for a licensed contract security company, OAG 00-166, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 169 (10/24/00).

Unless one of the exemptions listed in T.C.A. § 62-35-103 applies to the individual unarmed security guard, he or she is required to register with the department of commerce and insurance, OAG 06-146, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 166 (9/26/06).

62-35-116. Registration cards — Filing — Form — Fee — Contents — Change of registration status.

An application for a registration card shall be filed with the commissioner on the prescribed form. The application shall be accompanied by nonrefundable and nonproratable fees for both armed and unarmed registrations. The commissioner shall establish the amounts of the fees in varying amounts for different types of registrations at reasonable levels. The applicant shall furnish the following information:

Name and current residence address;

Date and place of birth;

Social security number;

Telephone number, if any;

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

One (1) set of classifiable electronic fingerprints;

One (1) head-and-shoulder photograph taken within the last six (6) months;

A general physical description;

A list of all convictions and pending charges of commission of a felony or misdemeanor in any jurisdiction;

A list of all names used by the applicant other than the name by which the applicant is currently known, with a statement explaining where, when and why the names were used;

A statement whether the applicant has ever been issued or denied a registration card in any jurisdiction and whether the card, if issued, has ever been revoked or suspended;

Type of military discharge; and

Type of security guard/officer registration card, armed or unarmed, applied for. If the applicant seeks an armed registration card, the application shall also include a signed sworn statement that the applicant has had no convictions in any state for a felony.

Any applicant who has already submitted an application for registration or to whom a valid registration card has been issued may submit an application to change registration status from unarmed to armed or from armed to unarmed status. The commissioner may establish the amounts of the fees at levels lower than those required for an initial application for registration.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 16; 1988, ch. 987, § 4; 1990, ch. 1026, § 5; 1991, ch. 425, §§ 1, 2; 2020, ch. 580, §§ 3-5.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted (a)(5) which read: “All residences during the immediate past five (5) years;”; deleted (a)(6) which read: “All employment or occupations engaged in during the immediate past five (5) years;”; substituted “One (1) set of classifiable electronic fingerprints” for “Three (3) sets of classifiable fingerprints” in (a)(7); and substituted “One (1) head-and-shoulder photograph” for “Three (3) head-and-shoulder photographs” in (a)(8).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 580, § 19. July 1, 2020.